Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.205

Director—Authority to impose administrative fines.

The director shall impose and collect the administrative fines authorized by this chapter. Any administrative fine imposed under this chapter or the agency rules adopted pursuant to this chapter may be appealed under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. Assessment of an administrative fine shall not preclude the initiation of any disciplinary, civil, or criminal action for the same or similar violations.

[ 1986 c 324 s 17.]